Illinois, session 104th, SB1284.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by adding Section 6.17 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.17 new)7    Sec. 6.17. Waiver application prohibitions.8    (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, except 9as specified in subsection (b), the State shall not apply for 10any federal waiver that would reduce or eliminate any 11protection or coverage required under the Patient Protection 12and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) that was in 13effect on January 1, 2017, including, but not limited to, any 14protection for persons with preexisting conditions and 15coverage for services identified as essential health benefits 16under the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act.17    (b) The State or an agency of the executive branch may 18apply for such a waiver only if the General Assembly, by joint 19resolution approved by a majority of each house prior to the 20submission of such a waiver application to the U.S. Department 21of Health and Human Services, authorizes the State or an 22agency of the executive branch to apply for such a federal 23waiver.    SB1284- 2 -LRB104 06140 BAB 16173 b1    Section 10. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 2adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 3    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)4    Sec. 356z.80. Waiver application prohibitions. 5    (a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, except 6as specified in subsection (b), the State shall not apply for 7any federal waiver that would permit an individual or group 8health insurance plan to reduce or eliminate any protection or 9coverage required under the Patient Protection and Affordable 10Care Act (Public Law 111-148) that was in effect on January 1, 112017, including, but not limited to, any protection for 12persons with preexisting conditions and coverage for services 13identified as essential health benefits under the Patient 14Protection and Affordable Care Act.15    (b) The State or an agency of the executive branch may 16apply for such a waiver only if the General Assembly, by joint 17resolution approved by a majority of each house prior to the 18submission of such a waiver application to the U.S. Department 19of Health and Human Services, authorizes the State or an 20agency of the executive branch to apply for such a federal 21waiver. 22    Section 15. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 23adding Section 5-61 as follows:   SB1284- 3 -LRB104 06140 BAB 16173 b1    (305 ILCS 5/5-61 new)2    Sec. 5-61. Waiver application prohibitions.3    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as specified in 4subsection (b), the State or an agency of the executive branch 5shall not apply for any federal Medicaid waiver that would 6result in more restrictive standards, methodologies, 7procedures, or other requirements than those that were in 8effect in Illinois as of January 1, 2017 for: (i) the Medical 9Assistance Program, as authorized under this Code and Title 10XIX of the Social Security Act; (ii) the Children's Health 11Insurance Program, as authorized under the Children's Health 12Insurance Program Act and Title XXI of the Social Security 13Act; or (iii) any other medical assistance program in Illinois 14that is operating under any existing federal waiver authorized 15under Section 1115 or Section 1915 of the Social Security Act.16    (b) The State or an agency of the executive branch may 17apply for such a waiver only if the General Assembly, by joint 18resolution approved by a majority of each house prior to the 19submission of such a waiver application to the U.S. Department 20of Health and Human Services, authorizes the State or an 21agency of the executive branch to apply for such a federal 22waiver.  23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.